Utah statutes.
61-2c-405.   Penalty for violating this chapter -- Automatic revocation.
(1)  In addition to being subject to a disciplinary action by the commission,
a person required to be licensed or certified under this chapter who violates
this chapter:
(a)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor upon conviction of a first violation
of this chapter; and
(b)  is guilty of a third degree felony upon conviction of a second or
subsequent violation of this chapter.
(2)  A license or certification issued by the division to a person convicted
of a violation of Section 76-6-1203 is automatically revoked.
